Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2656.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 16, chapter 7, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 16-1025, to read: START_STATUTE16-1025. Election worker harassment task force; membership; duties; annual report; definitions A. The election worker harassment task force is established in the secretary of state's office and consists of the following members: 1. One assistant attorney general from the criminal division of the attorney general's office who is appointed by the attorney general. 2. One assistant attorney general from the civil litigation division of the attorney general's office who is appointed by the attorney general. 3. Two members of law enforcement who are appointed by the attorney general. 4. Two election workers who are appointed by the secretary of state and who are members of different political parties or at least one of whom is registered as no party preference. 5. Four election officers who are appointed by the secretary of state, not more than two of whom are members of the same political party. B. The task force shall: 1. Elect a chairperson from among its membership. 2. Meet as often as the chairperson deems necessary. 3. Coordinate, investigate, prosecute or refer for prosecution violations of this chapter. 4. On or before January 1, 2028 and each year thereafter, the task force shall SUBMIT a report of its ACTIVITIES, including the number of and nature of reports received by the task force, to the governor, the president of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives, the chairperson of the house of representatives federalism, military affairs and elections committee, or its successor committee, and the chairperson of the Senate judiciary and elections committee, or its successor committee, and shall provide a copy of this report to the secretary of state. C. The secretary of state shall: 1. Provide ADMINISTRATIVE support to the task force, including record retention. 2. Provide the task force with meeting space. 3. Post the task force's annual report on the secretary of state's website. D. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Election officer" means an elected or appointed INDIVIDUAL who is engaged in elections administered by this state or a city, town, county, school district or other POLITICAL subdivision of this state and whose duties include administering, supporting, ascertaining, announcing, declaring or regulating elections. 2. "Election worker" includes a seasonal, part-time or full-time employee or a volunteer who is engaged in elections administered by this state or a city, town, county, school district or other political subdivision of this state and whose duties include administering, supporting, ascertaining, announcing, declaring or regulating elections. END_STATUTE